Ohio, session 136, HB499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3317.01, 5705.31, 5705.32, and 5
5705.321 be amended and section 5705.60 of the Revised Code be 6
enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 3317.01. As used in this section, "school district," 8
unless otherwise specified, means any city, local, exempted 9
village, joint vocational, or cooperative education school 10
district and any educational service center. 11
This chapter shall be administered by the department of 12
education and workforce. The department of education and 13
workforce shall calculate the amounts payable to each school 14
district and shall certify the amounts payable to each eligible 15
district to the treasurer of the district as provided by this 16
chapter. Certification of moneys pursuant to this section shall 17
include the amounts payable to each school building, at a 18
frequency determined by the department, for each subgroup of 19
students, as defined in section 3317.40 of the Revised Code, 20

H. B. No. 499 Page 2
As Introduced
receiving services, provided for by state funding, from the 21
district or school. No moneys shall be distributed pursuant to 22
this chapter without the approval of the controlling board. 23
The department shall, in accordance with appropriations 24
made by the general assembly, meet the financial obligations of 25
this chapter. 26
Moneys distributed to school districts pursuant to this 27
chapter shall be calculated based on the annual enrollment 28
calculated from the three reports required under section 3317.03 29
of the Revised Code and paid on a fiscal year basis, beginning 30
with the first day of July and extending through the thirtieth 31
day of June. In any given fiscal year, prior to school districts 32
submitting the first report required under section 3317.03 of 33
the Revised Code, enrollment for the districts shall be 34
calculated based on the third report submitted by the districts 35
for the previous fiscal year. The moneys appropriated for each 36
fiscal year shall be distributed periodically to each school 37
district unless otherwise provided for. The department, in June 38
of each year, shall submit to the controlling board the 39
department's year-end distributions pursuant to this chapter. 40
Except as otherwise provided, payments under this chapter 41
shall be made only to those school districts in which: 42
(A) The school district, except for any educational 43
service center and any joint vocational or cooperative education 44
school district, levies for current operating expenses at least 45
twenty mills, unless the school district is levying less than 46
that amount due to a reduction in collections made under 47
division (D) of section 5705.31 of the Revised Code or division 48
(A) of section 5705.32 of the Revised Code relating to a 49
declaration made by the board under division (E) of section 50

H. B. No. 499 Page 3
As Introduced
5705.29 of the Revised Code. Levies for joint vocational or 51
cooperative education school districts or county school 52
financing districts, limited to or to the extent apportioned to 53
current expenses, shall be included in this qualification 54
requirement. School district income tax levies under Chapter 55
5748. of the Revised Code, limited to or to the extent 56
apportioned to current operating expenses, shall be included in 57
this qualification requirement to the extent determined by the 58
tax commissioner under division (C) of section 3317.021 of the 59
Revised Code. 60
(B) The school year next preceding the fiscal year for 61
which such payments are authorized meets the requirement of 62
section 3313.48 of the Revised Code, with regard to the minimum 63
number of hours school must be open for instruction with pupils 64
in attendance, for individualized parent-teacher conference and 65
reporting periods, and for professional meetings of teachers. 66
A school district shall not be considered to have failed 67
to comply with this division because schools were open for 68
instruction but either twelfth grade students were excused from 69
attendance for up to the equivalent of three school days or only 70
a portion of the kindergarten students were in attendance for up 71
to the equivalent of three school days in order to allow for the 72
gradual orientation to school of such students. 73
A board of education or governing board of an educational 74
service center which has not conformed with other law and the 75
rules pursuant thereto, shall not participate in the 76
distribution of funds authorized by this chapter, except for 77
good and sufficient reason established to the satisfaction of 78
the department and the state controlling board. 79
All funds allocated to school districts under this 80

H. B. No. 499 Page 4
As Introduced
chapter, except those specifically allocated for other purposes, 81
shall be used to pay current operating expenses only. 82
Sec. 5705.31. The county auditor shall present to the 83
county budget commission the annual tax budgets submitted under 84
sections 5705.01 to 5705.47 of the Revised Code, together with 85
an estimate prepared by the auditor of the amount of any state 86
levy, the rate of any school tax levy as previously determined, 87
the tax commissioner's estimate of the amount to be received in 88
the county public library fund, the tax rates provided under 89
section 5705.281 of the Revised Code if adoption of the tax 90
budget was waived under that section, and such other information 91
as the commission requests or the tax commissioner prescribes. 92
The budget commission shall examine such budget and, if 93
the taxing authority is a board of education that has elected to 94
include projections pursuant to division (E) of section 5705.391 95
of the Revised Code, shall examine such projections. Using the 96
budget and, if applicable, included projections, the budget 97
commission shall ascertain the total amount proposed to be 98
raised in the county for the purposes of each subdivision and 99
other taxing units in the county and the need for those amounts. 100
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the county budget 101
commission may reduce the amount to be raised by any levy 102
pursuant to section 5705.32 of the Revised Code. 103
The commission shall ascertain that the following levies 104
have been properly authorized and, if so authorized, shall 105
approve them without modification: 106
(A) All levies in excess of the ten-mill limitation in the 107
first year they are levied, unless the levy is the renewal of an 108
existing tax or the subdivision or taxing unit requests an 109
amount requiring a lower rate for the succeeding fiscal year. 110

H. B. No. 499 Page 5
As Introduced
Such a request for an amount requiring a lower rate applies only 111
to the succeeding fiscal year unless the subdivision or taxing 112
unit expressly states that the request is permanent. 113
(B) All levies for unsatisfied debt charges, including 114
levies that remain necessary to pay notes issued for emergency 115
purposes; 116
(C) The levies prescribed by division (B) of sections 117
742.33 and 742.34 of the Revised Code; 118
(D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a 119
minimum levy within the ten-mill limitation for the current 120
expense and debt service of each subdivision or taxing unit, 121
which shall equal two-thirds of the average levy for current 122
expenses and debt service allotted within the fifteen-mill 123
limitation to such subdivision or taxing unit during the last 124
five years the fifteen-mill limitation was in effect unless such 125
subdivision or taxing unit requests an amount requiring a lower 126
rate for the succeeding fiscal year, or if it expressed its 127
intent to forgo collections from such a levy under division (E) 128
of section 5705.29 of the Revised Code. Such a request for an 129
amount requiring a lower rate applies only to the succeeding 130
fiscal year unless the subdivision or taxing unit expressly 131
states that the request is permanent. 132
Except as provided in section 5705.312 of the Revised 133
Code, if the levies required in divisions (B) and (C) of this 134
section for the subdivision or taxing unit equal or exceed the 135
entire minimum levy of the subdivision as fixed, the minimum 136
levies of the other subdivisions or taxing units shall be 137
reduced by the commission to provide for the levies and an 138
operating levy for the subdivision. Such additional levy shall 139
be deducted from the minimum levies of each of the other 140

H. B. No. 499 Page 6
As Introduced
subdivisions or taxing units, but the operating levy for a 141
school district shall not be reduced below a figure equivalent 142
to forty-five per cent of the millage available within the ten- 143
mill limitation after all the levies in divisions (B) and (C) of 144
this section have been provided for. 145
If a municipal corporation and a township have entered 146
into an annexation agreement under section 709.192 of the 147
Revised Code in which they agree to reallocate their shares of 148
the minimum levies established under this division and if that 149
annexation agreement is submitted along with the annual tax 150
budget of both the township and the municipal corporation, then, 151
when determining the minimum levy under this division, the 152
auditor shall allocate, to the extent possible, the minimum levy 153
for that municipal corporation and township in accordance with 154
their annexation agreement. 155
Divisions (A) to (D) of this section are mandatory, and 156
commissions shall be without discretion to reduce such minimum 157
levies except as provided in such divisions. 158
If any debt charge is omitted from the budget, the 159
commission shall include it therein. 160
Sec. 5705.32. (A) The county budget commission shall 161
adjust the estimated amounts required from the general property 162
tax for each fund, as shown by the tax budgets or other 163
information required to be provided under section 5705.281 of 164
the Revised Code, so as to bring the tax levies required 165
therefor within the limitations specified in sections 5705.01 to 166
5705.47 of the Revised Code, for such levies. The commission may 167
revise and adjust the estimate of balances and receipts from all 168
sources for each fund and shall determine the total 169
appropriations that may be made therefrom. 170

H. B. No. 499 Page 7
As Introduced
If a taxing unit declared its intent to forgo all or a 171
portion of collections under division (E) of section 5705.29 of 172
the Revised Code, the commission shall adjust the rate of each 173
levy as required to result in that reduction in collections. 174
(B) Except as otherwise provided in section 5705.31 of the 175
Revised Code, the county budget commission may adjust the 176
estimated amounts required from the general property tax for 177
each fund, as shown by the tax budgets or other information 178
required to be provided under section 5705.281 of the Revised 179
Code, so as to bring the tax levies required therefor within 180
levels the commission finds reasonable and prudent to avoid 181
unnecessary, excessive, or unneeded collections. If the county 182
budget commission adjusts amounts from any tax levy, the 183
adjustment shall be subject to both of the following: 184
(1) No levy shall be reduced below the level that would 185
cause it to collect less than what the levy collected in the 186
preceding year, unless funds are available from reserve balance 187
accounts, nonexpendable trust funds, or carryover amounts to 188
offset a reduction below that level, and the budget commission 189
shall consider reserve balance accounts, nonexpendable trust 190
funds, and carryover amounts for that purpose; 191
(2) No levy may be reduced under division (B) of this 192
section to a level that would cause a school district subject to 193
division (A) of section 3317.01 of the Revised Code to levy less 194
than twenty mills for current operating expenses as required by 195
that division. 196
(C) The commission shall fix the amount of the county 197
public library fund to be distributed to each board of public 198
library trustees that has qualified under section 5705.28 of the 199
Revised Code for participation in the proceeds of such fund. The 200

H. B. No. 499 Page 8
As Introduced
amount paid to all libraries in the county from such fund shall 201
never be a smaller per cent of the fund than the average of the 202
percentages of the county's classified taxes that were 203
distributed to libraries in 1982, 1983, and 1984, as determined 204
by the county auditor. The commission shall base the amount for 205
distribution on the needs of such library for the construction 206
of new library buildings, parts of buildings, improvements, 207
operation, maintenance, or other expenses. In determining the 208
needs of each library board of trustees, and in calculating the 209
amount to be distributed to any library board of trustees on the 210
basis of its needs, the commission shall make no reduction in 211
its allocation from the fund on account of additional revenues 212
realized by a library from increased taxes or service charges 213
voted by its electorate, from revenues received through federal 214
or state grants, projects, or programs, or from grants from 215
private sources. 216
(C)(D) Notwithstanding the fact that alternative methods 217
of financing such needs are available, after fixing the amount 218
to be distributed to libraries, the commission shall fix the 219
amount, if any, of the county public library fund to be 220
distributed to each board of township park commissioners, the 221
county, and each municipal corporation in accordance with the 222
following: 223
(1) Each municipal corporation in the county shall receive 224
a per cent of the remainder that equals the per cent that the 225
county auditor determines the classified property taxes 226
originating in such municipal corporation in 1984 were of the 227
total of all of the county's classified property taxes in 1984. 228
The commission may deduct from this amount any amount that the 229
budget commission allows to the board of township park 230
commissioners of a township park district, the boundaries of 231

H. B. No. 499 Page 9
As Introduced
which are coextensive with or contained within the boundaries of 232
the municipal corporation. 233
(2) The county shall receive a per cent of the remainder 234
that equals the per cent that the county auditor determines the 235
classified property taxes originating outside of the boundaries 236
of municipal corporations in the county in 1984 were of the 237
total of all of the county's classified property taxes in 1984. 238
The commission may deduct from this amount any amount that the 239
budget commission allows to the board of township park 240
commissioners of a township park district, the boundaries of 241
which are not coextensive with or contained within those of any 242
municipal corporation in the county. 243
(D)(E) The commission shall separately set forth the 244
amounts fixed and determined under divisions (B)(C) and (C)(D) 245
of this section in the "official certificate of estimated 246
resources," as provided in section 5705.35 of the Revised Code, 247
and separately certify such amount to the county auditor who 248
shall be guided thereby in the distribution of the county public 249
library fund for and during the fiscal year. In determining such 250
amounts, the commission shall be guided by the estimate 251
certified by the tax commissioner and presented by the auditor 252
under section 5705.31 of the Revised Code, as to the total 253
amount of revenue to be received in the county public library 254
fund during such fiscal year. 255
(E)(1)(F)(1) At least five days before the date of any 256
meeting at which the budget commission plans to discuss the 257
distribution of the county public library fund, it shall notify 258
each legislative authority and board of public library trustees, 259
county commissioners, and township park commissioners eligible 260
to participate in the distribution of the fund of the date, 261

H. B. No. 499 Page 10
As Introduced
time, place, and agenda for the meeting. Any legislative 262
authority or board entitled to notice under this division may 263
designate an officer or employee of such legislative authority 264
or board to whom the commission shall deliver the notice. 265
(2) Before the final determination of the amount to be 266
allotted to each subdivision from any source, the commission 267
shall permit representatives of each subdivision and of each 268
board of public library trustees to appear before it to explain 269
its financial needs. 270
(F)(G) If any public library receives and expends any 271
funds allocated to it under this section for the construction of 272
new library buildings or parts of buildings, such library shall 273
be free and open to the inhabitants of the county in which it is 274
located. Any board of library trustees that receives funds under 275
this section and section 5747.48 of the Revised Code shall have 276
its financial records open for public inspection at all 277
reasonable times. 278
Sec. 5705.321. (A) As used in this section: 279
(1) "City, located wholly or partially in the county, with 280
the greatest population" means the city, located wholly or 281
partially in the county, with the greatest population residing 282
in the county; however, if the county budget commission on or 283
before January 1, 1998, adopted an alternative method of 284
apportionment that was approved by the city, located partially 285
in the county, with the greatest population but not the greatest 286
population residing in the county, "city, located wholly or 287
partially in the county, with the greatest population" means the 288
city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the 289
greatest population whether residing in the county or not, if 290
this alternative meaning is adopted by action of the board of 291

H. B. No. 499 Page 11
As Introduced
county commissioners and a majority of the boards of township 292
trustees and legislative authorities of municipal corporations 293
located wholly or partially in the county. 294
(2) "Participating political subdivision" means a 295
municipal corporation or township that satisfies all of the 296
following: 297
(a) It is located wholly or partially in the county. 298
(b) It is not the city, located wholly or partially in the 299
county, with the greatest population. 300
(c) Public library fund moneys are apportioned to it under 301
the county's alternative method or formula of apportionment in 302
the current calendar year. 303
(B) In lieu of the method of apportionment of the county 304
public library fund provided by division (C)(D) of section 305
5705.32 of the Revised Code, the county budget commission may 306
provide for the apportionment of the fund under an alternative 307
method or on a formula basis as authorized by this section. 308
Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this 309
section, the alternative method of apportionment shall have 310
first been approved by all of the following governmental units: 311
the board of county commissioners; the legislative authority of 312
the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the 313
greatest population; and a majority of the boards of township 314
trustees and legislative authorities of municipal corporations, 315
located wholly or partially in the county, excluding the 316
legislative authority of the city, located wholly or partially 317
in the county, with the greatest population. In granting or 318
denying approval for an alternative method of apportionment, the 319
board of county commissioners, boards of township trustees, and 320

H. B. No. 499 Page 12
As Introduced
legislative authorities of municipal corporations shall act by 321
motion. A motion to approve shall be passed upon a majority vote 322
of the members of a board of county commissioners, board of 323
township trustees, or legislative authority of a municipal 324
corporation, shall take effect immediately, and need not be 325
published. 326
Any alternative method of apportionment adopted and 327
approved under this division may be revised, amended, or 328
repealed in the same manner as it may be adopted and approved. 329
If an alternative method of apportionment adopted and approved 330
under this division is repealed, the county public library fund 331
shall be apportioned among the subdivisions eligible to 332
participate in the fund, commencing in the ensuing calendar 333
year, under the apportionment provided in divisions (B)(C) and 334
(C)(D) of section 5705.32 of the Revised Code, unless the repeal 335
occurs by operation of division (C) of this section or a new 336
method for apportionment of the fund is provided in the action 337
of repeal. 338
(C) This division applies only in counties in which the 339
city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the 340
greatest population has a population of twenty thousand or less 341
and a population that is less than fifteen per cent of the total 342
population of the county. In such a county, the legislative 343
authorities or boards of township trustees of two or more 344
participating political subdivisions, which together have a 345
population residing in the county that is a majority of the 346
total population of the county, each may adopt a resolution to 347
exclude the approval otherwise required of the legislative 348
authority of the city, located wholly or partially in the 349
county, with the greatest population. All of the resolutions to 350
exclude that approval shall be adopted not later than the first 351

H. B. No. 499 Page 13
As Introduced
Monday of August of the year preceding the calendar year in 352
which distributions are to be made under an alternative method 353
of apportionment. 354
A motion granting or denying approval of an alternative 355
method of apportionment under this division shall be adopted by 356
a majority vote of the members of the board of county 357
commissioners and by a majority vote of a majority of the boards 358
of township trustees and legislative authorities of the 359
municipal corporations located wholly or partially in the 360
county, other than the city, located wholly or partially in the 361
county, with the greatest population, shall take effect 362
immediately, and need not be published. The alternative method 363
of apportionment under this division shall be adopted and 364
approved annually, not later than the first Monday of August of 365
the year preceding the calendar year in which distributions are 366
to be made under it. A motion granting approval of an 367
alternative method of apportionment under this division repeals 368
any existing alternative method of apportionment, effective with 369
distributions to be made from the fund in the ensuing calendar 370
year. An alternative method of apportionment under this division 371
shall not be revised or amended after the first Monday of August 372
of the year preceding the calendar year in which distributions 373
are to be made under it. 374
(D) In determining an alternative method of apportionment 375
authorized by this section, the county budget commission may 376
include in the method any factor considered to be appropriate 377
and reliable, in the sole discretion of the county budget 378
commission. 379
(E) On the basis of any alternative method of 380
apportionment adopted and approved as authorized by this 381

H. B. No. 499 Page 14
As Introduced
section, as certified by the auditor to the county treasurer, 382
the county treasurer shall make distribution of the money in the 383
county public library fund to each subdivision eligible to 384
participate in the fund, and the auditor, when the amount of 385
those shares is in the custody of the treasurer in the amounts 386
so computed to be due the respective subdivisions, shall at the 387
same time certify to the tax commissioner the percentage share 388
of the county as a subdivision. All money received into the 389
treasury of a subdivision from the county public library fund in 390
a county treasury shall be paid into the general fund and used 391
for the current operating expenses of the subdivision. 392
(F) The actions of the county budget commission taken 393
pursuant to this section are final and may not be appealed to 394
the board of tax appeals, except on the issues of abuse of 395
discretion and failure to comply with the formula. 396
Sec. 5705.60. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying 397
fixed-sum levy" means a tax levied on property at whatever rate 398
is required to produce a specified amount of tax money, 399
including a tax levied under section 5705.199 of the Revised 400
Code, but not including a tax levied in excess of the ten-mill 401
limitation to pay debt charges. 402
(B) Each year, the tax commissioner shall determine by 403
what amount, if any, the rate of a qualifying fixed sum levy 404
must be changed for the levy to produce the levy's specified 405
amount of money for the current tax year. The tax commissioner 406
shall certify the amount determined for each fixed-sum levy to 407
the appropriate county auditor by the first day of September. 408
(C) Each county auditor to whom a rate change is certified 409
under division (B) of this section shall apply the adjusted rate 410
for the current tax year. 411

H. B. No. 499 Page 15
As Introduced
Section 2. That existing sections 3317.01, 5705.31, 412
5705.32, and 5705.321 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 413